Utah statutes.
76-8-313.   Threatening elected officials -- Assault.
A person commits assault on an elected official when he attempts or threatens,
irrespective of a showing of immediate force or violence, to inflict bodily
injury to the elected official with the intent to impede, intimidate, or
interfere with the elected official in the performance of his official duties
or with the intent to retaliate against the elected official because of the
performance of his official duties.
